Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 1. General Provisions and Definitions

§ 101.
Short title.

This title may be cited as the Vermont Trust Code.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 102.
Scope.

This title applies to express trusts, charitable or noncharitable, and trusts created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree that requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this title shall not apply to trusts described in the following provisions of Vermont Statutes Annotated: 3 V.S.A. chapter 16; 6 V.S.A. chapter 151; 8 V.S.A. chapters 103, 204, and 222; 10 V.S.A. chapters 11A, 12, and 59; 11A V.S.A. chapter 7; 15 V.S.A. chapter 11; 16 V.S.A. chapters 55, 90, and 131; 18 V.S.A. chapters 121, 177, and 225; 21 V.S.A. chapter 9; 24 V.S.A. chapters 65, 119, 125, and 133; 27 V.S.A. chapter 7; 28 V.S.A. chapter 11; 29 V.S.A. chapter 16; and 30 V.S.A. chapters 84 and 91; but section 1013 of this title (certification of trust) shall apply to all such trusts.

Section 1013 of this title (certification of trust) shall apply to all trusts described in subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 29, 2010.

§ 103.
Definitions.

In this title:

“Action,” with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act.

“Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on the effective date of this title.

“Beneficiary” means a person that:

has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or

in a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over trust property.

“Charitable trust” means a trust, or portion of a trust, created for a charitable purpose described in subsection 405(a) of this title.

“Conservator” shall have the same meaning as “Guardian of the property” under subdivision 7(A)(ii) of this section.

“Environmental law” means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment.

“Guardian.”
(7) (A) “Guardian.”

“Guardian of the person” means a person appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, and welfare of a minor or adult individual.

“Guardian of the property” means a person appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court to administer the estate of a minor or adult individual.

Neither term includes a guardian ad litem.

“Interests of the beneficiaries” means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust.

“Jurisdiction,” with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Power of withdrawal” means a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power:

exercisable by a trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard; or

exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or any interest therein.

“Qualified beneficiary” means a beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined, is:
(13) (A) “Qualified beneficiary” means a beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined, is:

a “first tier” beneficiary as a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

a “second tier” beneficiary who would be a first tier beneficiary of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subdivision (A)(i) of this subdivision (13) terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

a “final beneficiary” who would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (A)(ii) and (iii) of this subdivision (13), a second tier beneficiary or a final beneficiary shall not be a “qualified beneficiary” if the beneficiary’s interest in the trust:

is created by the exercise of a power of appointment and the exercise of the power of appointment is not irrevocable; or

may be eliminated by an amendment to the trust.

“Revocable,” as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Settlor” means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

“Spendthrift provision” means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary’s interest.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a Native American tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as expressed in the trust instrument or as may be established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding.

“Trust instrument” means an instrument executed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments to the instrument.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a cotrustee.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 104.
Knowledge.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person has knowledge of a fact if the person:

has actual knowledge of it;

has received a notice or notification of it; or

from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know it.

An organization that conducts activities through employees has notice or knowledge of a fact involving a trust only from the time the information was received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust, or would have been brought to the employee’s attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence. An organization exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the employee having responsibility to act for the trust and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an employee of the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual knows a matter involving the trust would be materially affected by the information.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section specifies when a person is deemed to know a fact. Subsection (a) states the general rule. Subsection (b) provides a special rule dealing with notice to organizations. Pursuant to subsection (a), a fact is known to a person if the person had actual knowledge of the fact, received notification of it, or had reason to know of the fact’s existence based on all of the circumstances and other facts known to the person at the time. Under subsection (b), notice to an organization is not necessarily achieved by giving notice to a branch office. Nor does the organization necessarily acquire knowledge at the moment the notice arrives in the organization’s mailroom. Rather, the organization has notice or knowledge of a fact only when the information is received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust, or would have been brought to the employee’s attention had the organization exercised reasonable diligence.

“Know” is used in its defined sense in Sections 109 (methods and waiver of notice), 305 (appointment of representative), 604(b) (limitation on contest of revocable trust), 812 (collecting trust property), 1009 (nonliability of trustee upon beneficiary’s consent, release, or ratification), and 1012 (protection of person dealing with trustee). But as to certain actions, a person is charged with knowledge of facts the person would have discovered upon reasonable inquiry.
See
Section 1005 (limitation of action against trustee following report of trustee).

This section is based on Uniform Commercial Code § 1-202 (2000 Annual Meeting Draft).

§ 105.
Default and mandatory rules.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this title governs the duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary.

The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of this title except:

the requirements for creating a trust;

the duty of a trustee to act in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries;

the requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its beneficiaries, and that the trust have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve;

the power of the Probate Division of the Superior Court to modify or terminate a trust under sections 410 through 416 of this title;

the effect of a spendthrift provision and the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as provided in chapter 5 of this title;

the power of the Probate Division of the Superior Court under section 702 of this title to require, dispense with, or modify or terminate a bond;

the power of the Probate Division of the Superior Court under subsection 708(b) of this title to adjust a trustee’s compensation specified in the terms of the trust which is unreasonably low or high;

the effect of an exculpatory term under section 1008 of this title;

the rights under sections 1010 through 1013 of this title of a person other than a trustee or beneficiary;

periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding;

the power of the Probate Division of the Superior Court to take such action and exercise such jurisdiction as may be necessary in the interests of justice; and

the subject matter jurisdiction of the Probate Division of the Superior Court and venue for commencing a proceeding as provided in sections 203 and 204 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) emphasizes that the Uniform Trust Code is primarily a default statute. While this Code provides numerous procedural rules on which a settlor may wish to rely, the settlor is generally free to override these rules and to prescribe the conditions under which the trust is to be administered. With only limited exceptions, the duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary are as specified in the terms of the trust.

Subsection (b) lists the items not subject to override in the terms of the trust. Because subsection (b) refers specifically to other sections of the Code, enacting jurisdictions modifying these other sections may also need to modify subsection (b).

Subdivision (b)(1) confirms that the requirements for a trust’s creation, such as the necessary level of capacity and the requirement that a trust have a legal purpose, are controlled by statute and common law, not by the settlor. For the requirements for creating a trust, see Sections 401-409. Subdivision (b)(12) makes clear that the settlor may not reduce any otherwise applicable period of limitations for commencing a judicial proceeding. See Sections 604 (period of limitations for contesting validity of revocable trust), and 1005 (period of limitation on action for breach of trust). Similarly, a settlor may not so negate the responsibilities of a trustee that the trustee would no longer be acting in a fiduciary capacity. Subdivision (b)(2) provides that the terms may not eliminate a trustee’s duty to act in good faith and in accordance with the purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries. For this duty, see Sections 801 and 814(a). Subdivision (b)(3) provides that the terms may not eliminate the requirement that a trust and its terms must be for the benefit of the beneficiaries. Subdivision (b)(3) also provides that the terms may not eliminate the requirement that the trust have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. Subdivisions (b)(2)-(3) are echoed in Sections 404 (trust and its terms must be for benefit of beneficiaries; trust must have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve), 801 (trustee must administer trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries), 802(a) (trustee must administer trust solely in interests of the beneficiaries), 814 (trustee must exercise discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries), and 1008 (exculpatory term unenforceable to extent it relieves trustee of liability for breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries).

The terms of a trust may not deny a court authority to take such action as necessary in the interests of justice, including requiring that a trustee furnish bond. Subdivision (b)(6), (13). Additionally, should the jurisdiction adopting this Code enact the optional provisions on subject-matter jurisdiction and venue, subdivision (b)(14) similarly provides that such provisions cannot be altered in the terms of the trust. The power of the court to modify or terminate a trust under Sections 410 through 416 is not subject to variation in the terms of the trust. Subdivision (b)(4). However, all of these Code sections involve situations which the settlor could have addressed had the settlor had sufficient foresight. These include situations where the purpose of the trust has been achieved, a mistake was made in the trust’s creation, or circumstances have arisen that were not anticipated by the settlor.

Section 813 imposes a general obligation to keep the beneficiaries informed as well as several specific notice requirements. Subdivisions (b)(8) and (b)(9), which were placed in brackets and made optional provisions by a 2004 amendment, specify limits on the settlor’s ability to waive these information requirements. With respect to beneficiaries age 25 or older, a settlor may dispense with all of the requirements of Section 813 except for the duties to inform the beneficiaries of the existence of the trust, of the identity of the trustee, and to provide a beneficiary upon request with such reports as the trustee may have prepared. Among the specific requirements that a settlor may waive include the duty to provide a beneficiary upon request with a copy of the trust instrument (Section 813(b)(1)), and the requirement that the trustee provide annual reports to the qualified beneficiaries (Section 813(c)). The furnishing of a copy of the entire trust instrument and preparation of annual reports may be required in a particular case, however, if such information is requested by a beneficiary and is reasonably related to the trust’s administration.

Responding to the desire of some settlors that younger beneficiaries not know of the trust’s bounty until they have reached an age of maturity and self-sufficiency, subdivision (b)(8) allows a settlor to provide that the trustee need not even inform beneficiaries under age 25 of the existence of the trust. However, pursuant to subdivision (b)(9), if the younger beneficiary learns of the trust and requests information, the trustee must respond. More generally, subdivision (b)(9) prohibits a settlor from overriding the right provided to a beneficiary in Section 813(a) to request from the trustee of an irrevocable trust copies of trustee reports and other information reasonably related to the trust’s administration.

During the drafting of the Uniform Trust Code, the drafting committee discussed and rejected a proposal that the ability of the settlor to waive required notice be based on the nature of the beneficiaries’ interest and not on the beneficiaries’ age. Advocates of this alternative approach concluded that a settlor should be able to waive required notices to the remainder beneficiaries, regardless of their age. Enacting jurisdictions preferring this alternative should substitute the language “adult and current or permissible distributees of trust income or principal” for the reference to “qualified beneficiaries” in subdivision (b)(8). They should also delete the reference to beneficiaries “who have attained the age of 25 years.”

Waiver by a settlor of the trustee’s duty to keep the beneficiaries informed of the trust’s administration does not otherwise affect the trustee’s duties. The trustee remains accountable to the beneficiaries for the trustee’s actions.

Neither subdivision (b)(8) nor (b)(9) apply to revocable trusts. The settlor of a revocable trust may waive all reporting to the beneficiaries, even in the event the settlor loses capacity. If the settlor is silent about the subject, reporting to the beneficiaries will be required upon the settlor’s loss of capacity.
See
Section 603.

In conformity with traditional doctrine, the Uniform Trust Code limits the ability of a settlor to exculpate a trustee from liability for breach of trust. The limits are specified in Section 1008. Subdivision (b)(10) of this section provides a cross-reference. Similarly, subdivision (b)(7) provides a cross-reference to Section 708(b), which limits the binding effect of a provision specifying the trustee’s compensation.

Finally, subdivision (b)(11) clarifies that a settlor is not free to limit the rights of third persons, such as purchasers of trust property. Subdivision (b)(5) clarifies that a settlor may not restrict the rights of a beneficiary’s creditors except to the extent a spendthrift restriction is allowed as provided in Article 5.

§ 106.
Common law of trusts; principles of equity.

The common law of trusts and principles of equity supplement this title, except to the extent modified by this title or another statute of this state.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The Uniform Trust Code codifies those portions of the law of express trusts that are most amenable to codification. The Code is supplemented by the common law of trusts, including principles of equity. To determine the common law and principles of equity in a particular state, a court should look first to prior case law in the state and then to more general sources, such as the Restatement of Trusts, Restatement (Third) of Property: Wills and Other Donative Transfers, and the Restatement of Restitution. The common law of trusts is not static but includes the contemporary and evolving rules of decision developed by the courts in exercise of their power to adapt the law to new situations and changing conditions. It also includes the traditional and broad equitable jurisdiction of the court, which the Code in no way restricts.

The statutory text of the Uniform Trust Code is also supplemented by these Comments, which, like the Comments to any Uniform Act, may be relied on as a guide for interpretation.
See Acierno v. Worthy Bros. Pipeline Corp.
, 656 A.2d 1085, 1090 (Del. 1995) (interpreting Uniform Commercial Code);

Yale University v. Blumenthal

, 621 A.2d 1304, 1307 (Conn. 1993) (interpreting Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act); 2 Norman Singer, Statutory Construction Section 52.05 (6th ed. 2000); Jack Davies, Legislative Law and Process in a Nutshell Section 55-4 (2d ed. 1986).

Comment Amended in 2005.

§ 107.
Governing law.

The meaning and effect of the terms of a trust are determined by:

the law of the jurisdiction designated in the terms unless the designation of that jurisdiction’s law is contrary to a strong public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

in the absence of a controlling designation in the terms of the trust, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section provides rules for determining the law that will govern the meaning and effect of particular trust terms. The law to apply to determine whether a trust has been validly created is determined under Section 403.

Subdivision (1) allows a settlor to select the law that will govern the meaning and effect of the terms of the trust. The jurisdiction selected need not have any other connection to the trust. The settlor is free to select the governing law regardless of where the trust property may be physically located, whether it consists of real or personal property, and whether the trust was created by will or during the settlor’s lifetime. This section does not attempt to specify the strong public policies sufficient to invalidate a settlor’s choice of governing law. These public policies will vary depending upon the locale and may change over time.

Subdivision (2) provides a rule for trusts without governing law provisions — the meaning and effect of the trust’s terms are to be determined by the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue. Factors to consider in determining the governing law include the place of the trust’s creation, the location of the trust property, and the domicile of the settlor, the trustee, and the beneficiaries.
See
Restatement (Second) of Conflict of Laws §§ 270 cmt. c and 272 cmt. d (1971). Other more general factors that may be pertinent in particular cases include the relevant policies of the forum, the relevant policies of other interested jurisdictions and degree of their interest, the protection of justified expectations and certainty, and predictability and uniformity of result.

See

Restatement (Second) of Conflict of Laws § 6 (1971). Usually, the law of the trust’s principal place of administration will govern administrative matters and the law of the place having the most significant relationship to the trust’s creation will govern the dispositive provisions.

This section is consistent with and was partially patterned on the Hague Convention on the Law Applicable to Trusts and on their Recognition, signed on July 1, 1985. Like this section, the Hague Convention allows the settlor to designate the governing law. Hague Convention art. 6. Absent a designation, the Convention provides that the trust is to be governed by the law of the place having the closest connection to the trust. Hague Convention art. 7. The Convention also lists particular public policies for which the forum may decide to override the choice of law that would otherwise apply. These policies are protection of minors and incapable parties, personal and proprietary effects of marriage, succession rights, transfer of title and security interests in property, protection of creditors in matters of insolvency, and, more generally, protection of third parties acting in good faith. Hague Convention art. 15.

For the authority of a settlor to designate a trust’s principal place of administration, see Section 108(a).

§ 108.
Principal place of administration.

Without precluding other means for establishing a sufficient connection with the designated jurisdiction, terms of a trust designating the principal place of administration are valid and controlling if:

a trustee’s principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a resident of the designated jurisdiction; or

all or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.

A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Without precluding the right of the Probate Division of the Superior Court to order, approve, or disapprove a transfer, the trustee, in furtherance of the duty prescribed by subsection (b) of this section, may transfer the trust’s principal place of administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside the United States.

The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of a trust’s principal place of administration not less than 60 days before initiating the transfer. The notice of proposed transfer must include:

the name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of administration is to be transferred;

the address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee can be contacted;

an explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;

the date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and

the date, not less than 60 days after the giving of the notice, by which the qualified beneficiary must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer.

The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust’s principal place of administration terminates if a qualified beneficiary notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the date specified in the notice.

In connection with a transfer of the trust’s principal place of administration, the trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to a successor trustee designated in the terms of the trust or appointed pursuant to section 704 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section prescribes rules relating to a trust’s principal place of administration. Locating a trust’s principal place of administration will ordinarily determine which court has primary if not exclusive jurisdiction over the trust. It may also be important for other matters, such as payment of state income tax or determining the jurisdiction whose laws will govern the trust. See Section 107 comment.

Because of the difficult and variable situations sometimes involved, the Uniform Trust Code does not attempt to further define principal place of administration. A trust’s principal place of administration ordinarily will be the place where the trustee is located. Determining the principal place of administration becomes more difficult, however, when cotrustees are located in different states or when a single institutional trustee has trust operations in more than one state. In such cases, other factors may become relevant, including the place where the trust records are kept or trust assets held, or in the case of an institutional trustee, the place where the trust officer responsible for supervising the account is located.

A concept akin to principal place of administration is used by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency. Reserves that national banks are required to deposit with state authorities is based on the location of the office where trust assets are primarily administered.
See
12 C.F.R. Section 9.14(b).

Under the Uniform Trust Code, the fixing of a trust’s principal place of administration will determine where the trustee and beneficiaries have consented to suit (Section 202), and the rules for locating venue within a particular state (Section 204). It may also be considered by a court in another jurisdiction in determining whether it has jurisdiction, and if so, whether it is a convenient forum.

A settlor expecting to name a trustee or cotrustees with significant contacts in more than one state may eliminate possible uncertainty about the location of the trust’s principal place of administration by specifying the jurisdiction in the terms of the trust. Under subsection (a), a designation in the terms of the trust is controlling if (1) a trustee is a resident of or has its principal place of business in the designated jurisdiction, or (2) all or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction. Designating the principal place of administration should be distinguished from designating the law to determine the meaning and effect of the trust’s terms, as authorized by Section 107. A settlor is free to designate one jurisdiction as the principal place of administration and another to govern the meaning and effect of the trust’s provisions.

Subsection (b) provides that a trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries. “Interests of the beneficiaries,” defined in Section 103(8), means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust. Ordinarily, absent a substantial change or circumstances, the trustee may assume that the original place of administration is also the appropriate place of administration. The duty to administer the trust at an appropriate place may also dictate that the trustee not move the trust.

Subsections (c)-(f) provide a procedure for changing the principal place of administration to another state or country. Such changes are often beneficial. A change may be desirable to secure a lower state income tax rate, or because of relocation of the trustee or beneficiaries, the appointment of a new trustee, or a change in the location of the trust investments. The procedure for transfer specified in this section applies only in the absence of a contrary provision in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105. To facilitate transfer in the typical case, where all concur that a transfer is either desirable or is at least not harmful, a transfer can be accomplished without court approval unless a qualified beneficiary objects. To allow the qualified beneficiaries sufficient time to review a proposed transfer, the trustee must give the qualified beneficiaries at least 60 days prior notice of the transfer. Notice must be given not only to qualified beneficiaries as defined in Section 103(13) but also to those granted the rights of qualified beneficiaries under Section 110. To assure that those receiving notice have sufficient information upon which to make a decision, minimum contents of the notice are specified. If a qualified beneficiary objects, a trustee wishing to proceed with the transfer must seek court approval.

In connection with a transfer of the principal place of administration, the trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to a new trustee located outside of the state. The appointment of a new trustee may also be essential if the current trustee is ineligible to administer the trust in the new place. Subsection (f) clarifies that the appointment of the new trustee must comply with the provisions on appointment of successor trustees as provided in the terms of the trust or under Section 704. Absent an order of succession in the terms of the trust, Section 704(c) provides the procedure for appointment of a successor trustee of a noncharitable trust, and Section 704(d) the procedure for appointment of a successor trustee of a charitable trust.

While transfer of the principal place of administration will normally change the governing law with respect to administrative matters, a transfer does not normally alter the controlling law with respect to the validity of the trust and the construction of its dispositive provisions.
See
5A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts Section 615 (4th ed. 1989).

§ 109.
Methods and waiver of notice.

Notice to a person under this title or the sending of a document to a person under this title must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document. Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, commercial delivery service, personal delivery, delivery to the person’s last known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

Notice otherwise required under this title or a document otherwise required to be sent under this title need not be provided to a person whose identity or location is unknown to and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee.

Notice under this title or the sending of a document under this title may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

Notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of court procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) clarifies that notices under the Uniform Trust Code may be given by any method likely to result in its receipt by the person to be notified. The specific methods listed in the subsection are illustrative, not exhaustive. Subsection (b) relieves a trustee of responsibility for what would otherwise be an impossible task, the giving of notice to a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee. The section does not define when a notice is deemed to have been sent or delivered or person deemed to be unknown or not reasonably ascertainable, the drafters preferring to leave this issue to the enacting jurisdiction’s rules of civil procedure.

Under the Uniform Trust Code, certain actions can be taken upon unanimous consent of the beneficiaries or qualified beneficiaries. See Sections 411 (termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust) and 704 (appointment of successor trustee). Subsection (b) of this section only authorizes waiver of notice. A consent required from a beneficiary in order to achieve unanimity is not waived because the beneficiary is missing. But the fact a beneficiary cannot be located may be a sufficient basis for a substitute consent to be given by another person on the beneficiary’s behalf under the representation principles of Article 3.

To facilitate administration, subsection (c) allows waiver of notice by the person to be notified or sent the document. Among the notices and documents to which this subsection can be applied are notice of a proposed transfer of principal place of administration (Section 108(d)) or of a trustee’s report (Section 813(c)). This subsection also applies to notice to qualified beneficiaries of a proposed trust combination or division (Section 417), of a temporary assumption of duties without accepting trusteeship (Section 701(c)(1)), and of a trustee’s resignation (Section 705(a)(1)).

Notices under the Uniform Trust Code are nonjudicial. Pursuant to subsection (d), notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure.